Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18r-1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this act:

1. “Labor trafficking” means human trafficking for labor as
defined in Section 748 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Private organization” means a nonprofit corporation
certified by the Office of the Attorney General that provides
support services to adult victims of human trafficking;
3. “Sexual trafficking” means human trafficking for commercial
sex as defined in Section 748 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
and
4. “Victim” means a person against whom an act of labor
trafficking or sexual trafficking has been committed.
B. 1. The Office of the Attorney General shall establish a
two-year pilot program to support victims of sexual and labor
trafficking. The Office of the Attorney General shall make grants
available from funds in the Victims of Human Trafficking and
Prevention Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 748.3 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes for the purposes of this act. The grants
shall be made directly to no more than ten private organizations in
this state.
2. The purpose of such grants shall be to reimburse private
organizations for the qualifying expenses of programs providing
services to victims of sexual and labor trafficking. Qualifying
expenses include, but are not limited to:
a. emergency shelter and transitional housing services,
b. mental health counseling and trauma-informed therapy,
c. medical and dental care services,
d. substance abuse treatment and recovery support,
e. legal assistance and advocacy services,
f. job training and employment assistance,
g. educational services and General Educational
Development (GED) completion assistance,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1379 Page 2

h. case management and coordination of services,
i. transportation assistance,
j. basic needs assistance including food, clothing, and
personal care items,
k. life skills training and financial literacy education,
l. child care services for victims with minor children,
and
m. other services deemed necessary by the Office of the
Attorney General for the recovery and restoration of
victims.
3. In order for a private organization to be considered
eligible to receive grants pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection, a private organization shall:
a. be in good standing and compliant with nonprofit
requirements of this state and federal law,
b. have demonstrated experience providing services to
victims of sexual or labor trafficking,
c. agree to provide services without regard to the
immigration status of the victim,
d. maintain confidentiality of victim information in
accordance with applicable state and federal law, and
e. maintain adequate liability insurance coverage as
determined by the Office of the Attorney General.
4. The Office of the Attorney General shall establish an
application process and review criteria for private organizations
seeking grants pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. The
Office of the Attorney General shall prioritize organizations that:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1379 Page 3

a. demonstrate a track record of successful service
delivery to victims,
b. employ trauma-informed care practices,
c. provide culturally competent services,
d. collaborate with law enforcement and other service
providers, and
e. serve geographic areas or populations with
demonstrated need.
5. Grants provided to private organizations pursuant to this
act shall be used solely for the provision of direct services to
victims and shall not be used for administrative overhead that
exceeds fifteen percent (15%) of the total grant amount.
C. Any private organization that receives a grant pursuant to
the provisions of this act shall submit quarterly reports to the
Office of the Attorney General that include the following
information:
1. Number of victims served;
2. Types of services provided to victims;
3. Expenditure of grant funds; and
4. Outcomes achieved to the extent measurable.
D. The Office of the Attorney General shall monitor compliance
of private organizations that receive grants pursuant to this act.
The Office of the Attorney General may:
1. Require periodic reports on services provided and outcomes
achieved;
2. Conduct site visits and review of grant recipients;
3. Review financial records and documentation of expenditures;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1379 Page 4

4. Require corrective action plans for organizations that do
not meet grant eligibility requirements; and
5. Suspend or terminate grants to private organizations that
fail to comply with the terms and conditions of the grant or the
requirements established pursuant to this act.
E. The Office of the Attorney General shall compile an annual
report regarding the implementation of the pilot program established
in this act. The report shall be submitted electronically to the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives by December 1 of each year. The
report shall include:
1. The number of organizations that receive grants;
2. The total amount of grant funds distributed;
3. An aggregate summary of services provided and victims
served;
4. An evaluation of the effectiveness of the pilot program; and
5. Recommendations for improvement of the pilot program.
F. The Office of the Attorney General shall promulgate rules to
effectuate the provisions of this act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 376, O.S.L.
2023 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 748.3), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 748.3. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the Office of the Attorney General to
be designated the “Victims of Human Trafficking and Prevention
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
from penalties imposed by the courts on convictions of human
trafficking violations and funds received from any other source,
including legislative appropriations. All monies accruing to the
credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Office of the Attorney General for the purposes
ENR. S. B. NO. 1379 Page 5

provided in subsection B of this section. Expenditures from the
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
B. The purposes of the fund include, but are not limited to:
1. Educating the public about the recruitment, trafficking, and
exploitation of persons through human trafficking;
2. Assisting in the prevention of recruitment in schools of
minors for exploitation;
3. Establishing a survivors’ resource center to make
information available to survivors of human trafficking about
services and resources, including legal services, social services,
safe harbors, safe houses, and language services;
4. Assisting in the coordination between law enforcement
agencies and service providers; and
5. Providing information concerning a petition for expungement
of a criminal history record resulting from the arrest or filing of
charges for an offense committed or reported to have been committed
while the person was a victim of human trafficking; and
6. Providing grants to nonprofit organizations pursuant to
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1379 Page 6

Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1379 Page 7